Utah statutes.
76-3-203.7.   Increase of sentence for violent felony if body armor used.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Body armor" means any material designed or intended to provide bullet penetration resistance or protection from bodily injury caused by a dangerous weapon.

(b)  "Dangerous weapon" has the same definition as in Section 76-1-601.

(c)  "Violent felony" has the same definition as in Section 76-3-203.5.

(2)  A person convicted of a violent felony may be sentenced to imprisonment for an indeterminate term, as provided in Section 76-3-203, but if the trier of fact finds beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant used, carried, or possessed a dangerous weapon and also used or wore body armor, with the intent to facilitate the commission of the violent felony, and the violent felony is:

(a)  a first degree felony, the court shall sentence the person convicted for a term of not less than six years, and which may be for life;

(b)  a second degree felony, the court shall sentence the person convicted for a term of not less than two years nor more than 15 years, and the court may sentence the person convicted for a term of not less than two years nor more than 20 years; and

(c)  a third degree felony, the court shall sentence the person convicted for a term of not less than one year nor more than five years, and the court may sentence the person convicted for a term of not less than one year nor more than 10 years.

(3)  The sentencing enhancement described in this section does not apply if:

(a)  the offense for which the person is being sentenced is:

(i)  a grievous sexual offense;

(ii)  child kidnapping, Section 76-5-301.1;

(iii)  aggravated kidnapping, Section 76-5-302; or

(iv)  forcible sexual abuse, Section 76-5-404; and

(b)  applying the sentencing enhancement provided for in this section would result in a lower maximum penalty than the penalty provided for under the section that describes the offense for which the person is being sentenced.



Amended by Chapter 339, 2007 General Session

